Maryland, session 2025, SB0683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.

SENATE BILL 683 3
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
118. the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee
Assistance Loan Fund;
7–324.
(a) In this section, “Account” means the Catastrophic Event Account.
(b) Subject to the provisions of this section, the Account is established to enable
the State or a local government to respond without undue delay to:
(1) a natural disaster or other catastrophic situation[, or];
(2) federal employee financial hardship from a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in federal appropriations that cannot be taken care of
within the resources of existing appropriations; OR
(3) FORMER FEDERAL EMPLOYEE FINANCIAL HARDSHIP FROM THE
CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES.
(c) The Governor may provide an appropriation in the budget bill to the Account.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, after a 15–day review and
comment period by the Legislative Policy Committee, the Governor may transfer funds by
budget amendment from the Account to the expenditure accounts of the appropriate unit
of State government or unit of local government.
(2) If the federal government is in a full or partial shutdown due to a lapse
in appropriations, after a 2–day review and comment period by the Legislative Policy
Committee, the Governor may transfer funds by budget amendment from the Account to
the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee Assistance Loan Fund established under §
7–327 of this subtitle.
(e) Funds appropriated to the Catastrophic Event Account:

SENATE BILL 683
(1) may not be used to offset operating deficiencies in regular programs of
State government; but
(2) may be expended to assist a unit of State government or unit of local
government in funding costs in connection with:
(I) a natural disaster[,];
(II) a catastrophic situation[, or];
(III) a full or partial federal government shutdown due to a lapse in
appropriations; OR
(IV) A CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(f) (1) The Account is a continuing, nonlapsing fund which is not subject to §
7–302 of this subtitle.
(2) The Treasurer shall separately hold, and the Comptroller shall account
for, the Account.
(3) The Account shall be invested and reinvested in the same manner as
other State funds.
(4) Any investment earnings shall be subject to § 7–311(d) of this subtitle.
(g) Money appropriated to the Account does not revert to the Revenue
Stabilization Account.
7–327.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee
Assistance Loan Fund.
(b) There is a Federal Government [Shutdown] Employee Assistance Loan Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide loans to [employees of the federal
government] STATE RESIDENTS who [are] are:
(1) [required to report to work at a work site located in the State; and
(2)] ARE EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, REQUIRED TO
REPORT TO WORK, AND WHO ARE not being paid because of a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in appropriations AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR

SENATE BILL 683 5
(2) IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6 MONTHS, AND ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2025, WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE
EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL, AND WHO ARE EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS
DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(d) The Maryland Department of Labor shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
this subtitle that shall be available in perpetuity for the purpose of providing loans in
accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(3) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR IS AUTHORIZED TO
DISCLOSE INFORMATION TO THIRD–PARTY VENDORS TO VERIFY FEDERAL
EMPLOYMENT FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSISTING WITH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE FUND, SUBJECT TO PRIVACY CONSIDERATIONS.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) any interest earnings of the Fund;
(3) money transferred from the Catastrophic Event Account in accordance
with § 7–324 of this subtitle;
(4) repayments on loans made from the Fund; and
(5) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund shall be used only to provide no–interest loans to [employees of the
federal government] STATE RESIDENTS who [are] are:
(1) [required to report to work at a work site located in the State; and
(2)] ARE EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, REQUIRED TO
REPORT TO WORK, AND WHO ARE not being paid because of a full or partial federal
government shutdown due to a lapse in appropriations AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR

SENATE BILL 683
(2) IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 6 MONTHS, AND ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2025, WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF
THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE
EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL, AND WHO ARE EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS
DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Maryland Department
of Labor shall establish procedures and eligibility criteria for loans from the Fund.
(2) The eligibility criteria shall include that:
(i) 1. the federal government is in a full or partial shutdown due
to a lapse in appropriations; OR
2. A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT HAS BEEN
CLOSED, BEEN RELOCATED, EXPERIENCED MASS LAYOFFS, OR EXPERIENCED
OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES; and
(ii) an individual applying for a loan from the Fund is A RESIDENT
OF THE STATE WHO IS:
1. A RESIDENT OF THE STATE; AND
2. A. 1. an employee of the federal government WHO IS,
REQUIRED TO REPORT TO WORK, AND NOT BEING PAID BECAUSE OF THE FULL OR
PARTIAL FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN DUE TO THE LAPSE IN
APPROPRIATIONS AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025; OR
[2. required to report to work at a work site located in the
State; and
3. not being paid because of the full or partial federal
government shutdown due to the lapse in appropriations]
B. 2. A FORMER EMPLOYEE OF THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT WHO, WITHIN THE 6 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF
THE LOAN APPLICATION, AND ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025, WAS TERMINATED
FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE,
RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR

SENATE BILL 683 7
OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES BEYOND THE INDIVIDUAL’S CONTROL, AND WHO
IS EXPERIENCING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS DETERMINED BY THE MARYLAND
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
(3) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MAY ESTABLISH OTHER
CRITERIA TO BEST ASSIST FEDERAL EMPLOYEES FACING FINANCIAL HARDSHIP.
(3) (4) The procedures shall include:
(i) application procedures;
(ii) payment procedures from the Fund; and
(iii) IF REPAYMENT IS REQUIRED, repayment procedures, including
timelines, for an individual to repay a loan from the Fund.
(5) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR MAY FORGIVE A LOAN
PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION.
Article – State Government
6–106.1.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) the federal government’s action or failure to take action may pose a
threat to the health and welfare of the residents of the State; and
(2) the State should investigate and obtain relief from any arbitrary,
unlawful, or unconstitutional federal action or inaction and prevent such action or inaction
from harming the residents of the State.
(b) (1) In addition to any other powers and duties and subject to the
requirements of this subsection, the Attorney General may investigate, commence, and
prosecute or defend any civil or criminal suit or action that is based on the federal
government’s action or inaction that threatens the public interest and welfare of the
residents of the State with respect to:
(i) protecting the health of the residents of the State and ensuring
the availability of affordable health care;
(ii) safeguarding public safety and security;
(iii) protecting civil liberties;

SENATE BILL 683
(iv) preserving and enhancing the economic security of workers and
retirees;
(v) protecting financial security of the residents of the State,
including their pensions, savings, and investments, and ensuring fairness in mortgages,
student loans, and the marketplace;
(vi) protecting the residents of the State against fraud and other
deceptive and predatory practices;
(vii) protecting the natural resources and environment of the State;
(viii) protecting the residents of the State against illegal and
unconstitutional federal immigration and travel restrictions; [or]
(IX) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT WHO ARE NOT BEING PAID BECAUSE OF
A FULL OR PARTIAL FEDERAL GOVERNMENT SHUTDOWN DUE TO A LAPSE IN
APPROPRIATIONS;
(X) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO WERE
EMPLOYEES OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, AND ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025:
1. WERE TERMINATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT DUE TO THE CLOSURE, RELOCATION, OR MASS LAYOFF OF
A UNIT OF THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, OR OTHER SIMILAR CIRCUMSTANCES
BEYOND THE EMPLOYEES’ CONTROL; OR
2. SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT BY THE FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT AS A RESULT OF A VOLUNTARY SEPARATION INCENTIVE PAYMENT;
(XI) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
INAPPROPRIATELY DENIED FEDERAL BENEFITS THAT THEY HAVE EARNED,
INCLUDING SOCIAL SECURITY BENEFITS, MEDICARE, AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
BENEFITS;
(XII) PROTECTING RESIDENTS OF THE STATE WHO ARE
INAPPROPRIATELY DENIED FEDERAL ENTITLEMENTS, INCLUDING MEDICAID; OR
[(ix)] (XIII) otherwise protecting, as parens patriae, the State’s
interest in the general health and well–being of its residents.
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, before
commencing a suit or an action under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the Attorney
General shall provide to the Governor:

SENATE BILL 683 9
(i) written notice of the intended suit or action; and
(ii) an opportunity to review and comment on the intended suit or
action.
(3) If the Governor objects to the intended suit or action for which notice
was provided under this subsection:
(i) the Governor shall provide in writing to the Attorney General the
reasons for the objection within 10 days after receiving the notice; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the
Attorney General shall consider the Governor’s objection before commencing the suit or
action.
(4) If the Attorney General determines that emergency circumstances
require the immediate commencement of a suit or an action under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the Attorney General shall provide to the Governor notice of the suit or action
as soon as reasonably practicable.
(c) The Governor’s proposed budget for fiscal year 2019, and for each fiscal year
thereafter, shall appropriate at least [$1,000,000] $2,500,000 to the Attorney General to
be used only for:
(1) carrying out this section; and
(2) employing [five] attorneys in the Office of the Attorney General.
Article – Tax – General
13–203.
(c) Subject to subsections (f) and (g) of this section, tax information may be
disclosed to:
(17) the Maryland Cannabis Administration; [and]
(18) a person, governmental entity, or tax compliance organization for the
purpose of assisting the Comptroller in tax compliance activity; AND
(19) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR TO THE EXTENT
NECESSARY TO:

SENATE BILL 683
(I) ADMINISTER THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEE
ASSISTANCE LOAN FUND UNDER § 7–327 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; OR
(II) DETECT AND PREVENT FRAUDULENT CLAIMS FOR RELIEF
OR AVOIDANCE OF REPAYMENT REQUIRED UNDER § 7–327 OF THE STATE FINANCE
AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the Maryland Department of Labor shall conduct research and analysis
on foreclosure activity in Maryland, particularly as it relates to federal workers, to include,
to the extent practicable, federal contractors impacted by layoffs since January 1, 2025; and
(2) on or before December 31, 2025, the Maryland Department of Labor
shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on any data findings or trend analysis as it relates to foreclosures in Maryland for
this worker population.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Notwithstanding § 7–311(i) of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
after providing the Legislative Policy Committee with at least 7 days to review and
comment, the Governor may transfer up to $5,000,000 from the Revenue Stabilization
Account under § 7–311 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to the Federal
Government Employee Assistance Loan Fund under § 7–327 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) Notwithstanding § 7–311(i) of the State Finance and Procurement Article,
after providing the Legislative Policy Committee with at least 7 days to review and
comment, the Governor may transfer up to $1,500,000 from the Revenue Stabilization
Account under § 7–311 of the State Finance and Procurement Article to the expenditure
accounts of the Attorney General to fund costs associated with carrying out § 6–106.1 of the
State Government Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted. Section 3 of this Act shall remain effective through March 30, 2026, and at the end
of March 30, 2026, Section 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.